Nebraska, session 109, LB1254.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1254 LB1254
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electronic smoking device means any product or device containing
nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives that
employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other
electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size,
to simulate smoking by delivering the nicotine, nicotine analogue,
tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form
to a person inhaling from the product or device; and
(b) Nicotine analogue has the same meaning as in section 28-1418.01.
(2) It shall be unlawful to sell at retail, offer for retail sale,
or distribute for retail sale or promotion in this state any electronic
smoking device manufactured on or after the effective date of this act
without a child safety feature.
(3) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class
IV misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to the interstate transportation of
electronic smoking devices or the storage of electronic smoking devices
in a warehouse or distribution center.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-2-